Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.691

Graduation rate improvement—Strategic plans—Adoption of strategies.

(1) By May 15, 1994, each state institution of higher education, as part of its strategic plan, shall adopt strategies designed to shorten the time required for students to complete a degree or certificate and to improve the graduation rate for all students.

(2) Beginning with the fall 1995-96 academic term, each institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall implement the strategies described in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 1993 c 414 s 2.]